Utah statutes.
63B-13-401.   Authorizations to construct capital facilities using institutional or agency funds.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah may use federal grants, research funds, and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Department of Chemistry Gauss Haus under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use donations and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a College of Health Academic Facility under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use donations and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Geology and Geophysics Building and parking terrace under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Utah State University use donations, federal grants, and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Child Care Facility under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Utah State University use donations and other institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a replacement Team Building at Romney Stadium under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that Utah State University use up to $200,000 of excess funds in its Contingency Reserve from state funded projects to increase the capacity of its chilled water plant.

(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Utah College of Applied Technology use donations to plan, design, and construct an Entrepreneurial Building at the Davis ATC campus under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the college may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(8)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Utah College of Applied Technology use donations, grants from the Community Impact Board, and existing reserves to plan, design, and construct a technology building at the Blanding campus of the Southeast ATC under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated; and

(b)  the college may request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(9) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Workforce Services use up to $2,801,000 from its Special Administrative Expense Fund to plan, design, and construct an Employment Center in Logan under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated.

(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that, if agreement is reached to acquire a site from Cache County or Logan City for the project, the Division of Facilities Construction and Management may sell or exchange the currently-owned Workforce Services property and apply the proceeds to the acquisition of the site and towards the cost of the project.

(10)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Natural Resources use up to $250,000 of the existing balance in its Wildlife Resources Trust Account to purchase property in Price to be used for a future office complex for the Department of Natural Resources.

(11)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Utah National Guard use federal funds to plan, design, and construct a Total Army School System (TASS) Barracks at Camp Williams under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the National Guard may not request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(12)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Utah National Guard use federal funds to plan, design, and construct a Readiness Center at Camp Williams under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the National Guard may request state funds for operations and maintenance.

(13)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Corrections, and Salt Lake Community College use donations, federal funds, and other non-appropriated funds to plan, design, and construct a Western Regional Public Safety Education and Training Center under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated or the construction of the project is otherwise exempt from the director's oversight;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project other than planning and design;

(c)  the Department of Public Safety and the Department of Corrections may request state funds for operations and maintenance; and

(d)  the college may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the college is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

